Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 243.650 is amended to read:
243.650. As used in ORS 243.650 to 243.809, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Appropriate  bargaining unit” means the unit designated by the Employment Relations Board
or voluntarily recognized by  the public employer to be appropriate for collective bargaining. How-
ever, an appropriate bargaining unit may not  include both academically licensed and unlicensed or
nonacademically licensed school employees. Academically licensed units may include  but are not
limited to teachers,  nurses, counselors, therapists, psychologists, child development specialists and
similar positions. This limitation does not apply to any  bargaining unit certified or recognized prior
to June 6, 1995, or to any school district with fewer than 50 employees.
(2) “Board” means the Employment Relations Board.
(3) “Certification” means official recognition by the board that a labor organization  is the ex-
clusive representative for all of the employees in the appropriate bargaining unit.
(4) “Collective bargaining” means the performance of the mutual obligation  of a public employer
and the representative of its employees to meet at reasonable  times and confer in good faith with
respect  to  employment relations for the purpose of negotiations concerning mandatory subjects of
bargaining, to meet and confer in  good faith in accordance with law with respect to any dispute
concerning the interpretation or application of a collective bargaining  agreement, and to execute
written contracts incorporating agreements that have been reached on  behalf of the public employer
and the employees in the bargaining unit covered by such negotiations. The obligation to  meet and
negotiate does not compel either party to agree to a  proposal or require the making of a concession.
This subsection  may not be construed to prohibit a public employer and a certified or recognized
representative  of  its employees from discussing or executing written agreements regarding matters
other than mandatory  subjects of bargaining that are not prohibited by law as long as there is mu-
tual agreement of the parties to discuss these matters, which are permissive  subjects of bargaining.
(5) “Compulsory arbitration” means the procedure whereby parties  involved in a labor dispute
are required by law to submit their differences to a third party for a final and binding decision.
Enrolled House Bill 4115 (HB 4115-A) Page 1
(6) “Confidential employee” means one who assists and acts in a confidential capacity to a per-
son who formulates, determines and effectuates management policies in the  area of collective bar-
gaining.
(7)(a) “Employment relations” includes, but is not limited  to, matters concerning direct or indi-
rect monetary benefits, hours, vacations, sick leave,  labor organization access to and communication
with represented employees, grievance procedures and other conditions of employment.
(b) “Employment relations” does not include  subjects determined to be permissive, nonmanda-
tory subjects of bargaining by the Employment Relations Board prior to June 6, 1995.
(c) After June 6, 1995, “employment relations” does not include subjects  that the Employment
Relations Board determines to have a greater impact  on management’s prerogative than on em-
ployee wages, hours, or other terms and conditions of employment.
(d) “Employment relations” does  not include subjects that have an insubstantial or de minimis
effect on public employee wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment.
(e) For school district bargaining:
(A) “Employment relations” includes class size and  caseload limits in schools that qualify for
assistance under Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965.
(B) “Employment relations”  excludes the school or educational calendar, standards of perform-
ance or criteria for evaluation of  teachers, the school curriculum, reasonable dress, grooming and
at-work personal conduct requirements respecting smoking, gum chewing and similar matters  of
personal conduct, the standards and procedures for student discipline,  the time between student
classes, the selection,  agendas and decisions of 21st Century Schools Councils established under
ORS 329.704, requirements for expressing milk under ORS 653.077, and any other  subject proposed
that is permissive under paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(f) For employee bargaining involving employees covered by ORS 243.736 and  employees of the
Department of Corrections who have direct contact with adults in  custody, “employment relations”
includes safety issues  that have an impact on the on-the-job safety of the employees or staffing levels
that have a significant impact on the on-the-job safety of the employees.
(g) For all other employee bargaining except school district bargaining and except  as provided
in paragraph (f) of this  subsection, “employment relations” excludes staffing levels and safety issues
(except  those  staffing levels and safety issues that have a direct and substantial effect on the on-
the-job safety of public employees), scheduling of services provided to  the public, determination of
the minimum qualifications necessary for any position, criteria for evaluation or performance  ap-
praisal, assignment of duties, workload  when the effect on duties is insubstantial, reasonable dress,
grooming, and at-work personal conduct requirements respecting smoking, gum chewing, and  similar
matters of personal conduct  at work, and any other subject proposed that is permissive under par-
agraphs (b), (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(8) “Exclusive representative” means  the labor organization that, as a result of certification by
the board or recognition by the employer, has the right to be the collective bargaining agent of  all
employees in an appropriate bargaining unit.
(9) “Fact-finding” means identification  of the major issues in a particular labor dispute by one
or more impartial individuals who review the positions  of the parties, resolve factual differences and
make recommendations for settlement of the dispute.
(10) “Fair-share agreement” means  an agreement between the public employer and the recog-
nized or certified bargaining representative of public employees whereby employees who  are not
members of the  employee organization are required to make an in-lieu-of-dues payment to an em-
ployee organization except as provided in ORS 243.666. Upon the filing with the board  of a petition
by 30 percent  or more of the employees in an appropriate bargaining unit covered by such union
security agreement declaring they desire that the agreement be rescinded, the  board shall take a
secret ballot of the  employees in the unit and certify the results thereof to the recognized or certi-
fied bargaining representative and to the public employer. Unless  a majority of the votes cast in an
election favor the  union security agreement, the board shall certify deauthorization of the agree-
ment. A petition for deauthorization of a union security agreement must be filed not more  than 90
Enrolled House Bill 4115 (HB 4115-A) Page 2
calendar days after the collective bargaining agreement is  executed. Only one such election may be
conducted in any appropriate bargaining unit during the term  of a collective bargaining agreement
between a public employer and the recognized or certified bargaining representative.
(11) “Final offer” means the proposed contract language and cost summary submitted  to the
mediator within seven days of the declaration of impasse.
(12) “Labor  dispute” means any controversy concerning employment relations or concerning the
association or representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining,  changing, or seeking to
arrange terms or conditions of employment  relations, regardless of whether the disputants stand in
the proximate relation of employer and employee.
(13) “Labor organization” means any organization that has as one of its purposes  representing
employees in their employment relations with public employers.
(14) “Last best offer package” means the offer exchanged by parties not  less than 14 days prior
to the date scheduled for an interest arbitration hearing.
(15) “Legislative body” means the Legislative Assembly, the city council, the  county commission
and any other board or commission empowered to levy taxes.
(16) “Managerial employee” means  an employee of the State of Oregon or a public university
listed in ORS 352.002 who possesses authority to formulate and carry out  management decisions or
who represents management’s  interest by taking or effectively recommending discretionary actions
that control or implement employer  policy, and who has discretion in the performance of these
management responsibilities beyond the routine  discharge of duties. A “managerial employee” need
not act in a  supervisory capacity in relation to other employees. Notwithstanding this subsection,
“managerial employee” does not include faculty members at a community college, college or uni-
versity.
(17) “Mediation” means assistance by an impartial  third party in reconciling a labor dispute
between the public employer and the exclusive representative regarding employment relations.
(18) “Payment-in-lieu-of-dues” means  an assessment to defray the cost for services by the exclu-
sive representative in negotiations and contract administration of all persons in an  appropriate
bargaining unit who are not members of the organization serving as exclusive  representative of the
employees. The payment must be equivalent to  regular union dues and assessments, if any, or must
be an amount  agreed upon by the public employer and the exclusive representative of the employees.
(19) “Public employee” means an employee of a public employer but does  not include elected
officials, persons appointed to serve on boards or commissions, incarcerated persons working under
Article I, section 41, of the Oregon Constitution, or persons who  are confidential employees, super-
visory employees or managerial employees.
(20) “Public employer” means the State of Oregon, and the following  political subdivisions:
Cities, counties, community colleges, school districts, special districts, mass transit districts,  metro-
politan service districts, public service corporations or municipal  corporations and public and
quasi-public corporations.
(21) “Public employer representative” includes any individual  or individuals specifically desig-
nated by the public employer to act in its interests in all matters dealing with employee represen-
tation, collective bargaining and related issues.
(22) “Strike” means  a public employee’s refusal in concerted action with others to report for
duty, or his or her willful absence from his or her position, or his or her stoppage of work, or  his
or her absence in whole or in part from the full, faithful or  proper performance of his or her duties
of employment, for the purpose of inducing,  influencing or coercing a change in the conditions,
compensation, rights, privileges  or obligations of public employment; however, nothing shall limit
or impair the right of any public employee to lawfully express or communicate  a complaint or
opinion on any matter related to the conditions of employment.
(23)(a) “Supervisory employee” means any individual having authority in the interest of  the
employer to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign,  reward or discipline
other employees, or responsibly to  direct them, or to adjust their grievances, or effectively to re-
commend such action, if in connection therewith, the exercise of the authority is not of a  merely
Enrolled House Bill 4115 (HB 4115-A) Page 3
routine or clerical nature but requires  the use of independent judgment. Failure to assert supervi-
sory status  in any Employment Relations Board proceeding or in negotiations for any collective
bargaining agreement does not thereafter prevent assertion of supervisory status  in any subsequent
board proceeding or contract negotiation.
(b) “Supervisory employee” includes :
(A) A faculty member of a public university  listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon Health and
Science University who:
[(A)] (i) Is employed as  a president, vice president, provost, vice provost, dean, associate dean,
assistant dean, head or equivalent position; or
[(B)] (ii) Is employed in an administrative position without a  reasonable expectation of teaching,
research or other scholarly accomplishments.
(B) A guard at a correctional institution or mental hospital or  a police officer who serves
in the  rank of lieutenant or higher except for those lieutenant guards or police officers who
were included in an appropriate bargaining unit for purposes of collective bargaining on or
before the effective date of this 2024 Act.
(C) An employee of the Criminal  Justice Division of the Department of Justice who
manages police officers of the division.
(c) “Supervisory employee” does not include:
(A) A nurse, charge nurse or  nurse holding a similar position if that position has not tradi-
tionally been classified as supervisory;
(B) A  firefighter or an emergency communications worker  prohibited from striking by ORS
243.736 who assigns, transfers or directs the work of other employees but does not  have the au-
thority to hire, discharge or impose economic discipline on those employees;
(C) A guard at a correctional institution or mental hospital or a police officer who:
(i) Serves in a rank equivalent to or below the rank of sergeant;
(ii) Is prohibited from striking by ORS 243.736; and
(iii) Assigns, transfers or directs the work  of other employees but does not have the
authority to hire, discharge or impose economic discipline on those employees;
[(C)] (D) A faculty  member of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon Health
and Science University who  is not a faculty member described in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
or
[(D)] (E) An employee of the Oregon State Police who:
(i) Serves in a rank equivalent to or below the rank of sergeant;
(ii) Is prohibited from striking by ORS 243.736; and
(iii) Assigns, transfers or directs the work of other employees but does not hire, discharge  or
impose economic discipline on those employees.
(24) “Unfair labor  practice” means the commission of an act designated an unfair labor practice
in ORS 243.672.
(25) “Voluntary  arbitration” means the procedure whereby parties involved in a labor dispute
mutually agree to submit their differences to a third party for a final and binding decision.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 243.682 is amended to read:
243.682. (1) If a question of representation exists, the Employment Relations Board [ shall]:
(a)(A)(i) Shall,  upon application  of a public employer, a public employee or a labor organization,
designate the appropriate bargaining unit, and in  making its determination shall consider such fac-
tors as community of interest, wages, hours and other  working conditions of the employees involved,
the history of collective bargaining, and the  desires of the employees. The board may determine a
unit to be the appropriate unit in a  particular case even though some other unit might also be ap-
propriate.
(ii) May not  designate as appropriate a bargaining unit that includes both guards at a
correctional institution or mental hospital or police officers who serve in a rank equivalent
to the rank of sergeant and rank-and-file subordinate employees. The  limitation under this
Enrolled House Bill 4115 (HB 4115-A) Page 4
sub-subparagraph does not apply to a bargaining unit certified or recognized prior to the ef-
fective date of this 2024 Act.
(B) Unless a labor organization and a public employer agree  otherwise, [ the board ] may not
designate as appropriate a bargaining unit that includes:
[(A)] (i) A faculty member described in ORS 243.650 [ (23)(c)(C)] (23)(c)(D) who supervises  one
or more other faculty members; and
[(B)] (ii) Any faculty member who is supervised by a faculty member described in  [subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph ] sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph .
(b) Shall investigate and conduct a hearing on a petition that has been filed by:
(A) A labor organization alleging that  30 percent of the employees in an appropriate bargaining
unit desire to be represented for collective bargaining by an exclusive representative;
(B) A labor organization alleging that 30 percent  of the employees in an appropriate bargaining
unit assert that the designated exclusive representative is  no longer the representative of the ma-
jority of the employees in the unit;
(C) A public employer  alleging that one or more labor organizations has presented a claim to
the public employer requesting recognition as the exclusive representative in  an appropriate bar-
gaining unit; or
(D) An employee or group of employees  alleging that 30 percent of the employees assert that the
designated exclusive representative is no  longer the representative of the majority of employees in
the unit.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding  subsection (1) of this section, when an employee, group of employees or
labor organization acting on behalf of the employees files a petition alleging that a  majority of em-
ployees in a unit appropriate for the  purpose of collective bargaining wish to be represented by a
labor organization for that purpose, or when a labor organization files a petition  alleging that the
majority  in  a group of unrepresented employees seek to be added to an existing bargaining unit, the
board shall investigate the petition. If the board  finds that a majority of the employees in a unit
appropriate for bargaining or a majority of employees in  a group of unrepresented employees that
is appropriate to add to an existing bargaining  unit have signed authorizations designating the labor
organization specified in the petition as the employees’ bargaining representative and  that no other
labor organization is currently  certified or recognized as the exclusive representative of any of the
employees in the unit or in the group of unrepresented employees  seeking to be added to an existing
bargaining unit, the board may not conduct an election but  shall certify the labor organization as
the exclusive representative unless a petition for  a representation election is filed as provided in
subsection (4) of this section.
(b) The board by rule shall develop guidelines and procedures for the designation by employees
of a bargaining representative in the manner described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection. The
guidelines and procedures must include:
(A) Model collective bargaining authorization language that may  be used for purposes of making
the designations described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(B) Procedures to be used by the board to establish the  authenticity of signed authorizations
designating bargaining representatives;
(C) Procedures to be used by the board to  notify affected employees of the filing of a petition
requesting certification under subsection (4) of this section;
(D) Procedures for filing a  petition to request a representation election, including a timeline of
not more than 14  days after notice has been delivered to the affected employees of a petition filed
under paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(E) Procedures  that may be used for preparing and signing authorizations designating bargaining
representatives using an electronic record and an electronic  signature, as those terms are defined
in ORS 84.004; and
(F) Procedures for expedited resolution of  any dispute about the scope of the appropriate bar-
gaining unit. The resolution of the dispute may occur after an election is conducted.
Enrolled House Bill 4115 (HB 4115-A) Page 5
(c) Solicitation and rescission of a signed authorization  designating bargaining representatives
are subject to the provisions of ORS 243.672.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a petition for represen-
tation submitted as an electronic record that includes a signed authorization using an  electronic
signature as described under subsection (2)(b)(E) of this section must:
(A) Include the following information:
(i) The name of signer;
(ii) The signer’s electronic mail address or social media account;
(iii) The signer’s telephone number;
(iv) The exact language that the signer is assenting to by providing the electronic signature;
(v) The date of submission of the electronic signature; and
(vi) The name of the public employer that employs the signer; and
(B) Be accompanied by a verification declaration by the petitioning party:
(i) Specifying the technology used to obtain and verify the signatures;
(ii) Providing the methods used to ensure the authenticity of the signature; and
(iii) Confirming that the information transmitted to the signer was the same information to
which the signer assented.
(b) If the technology used to  provide the signed authorization does not support digital signatures
that are suited to satisfy the  requirements of the verification declaration described in paragraph (a)
of this  subsection, the petitioning party must submit evidence that, after the petitioning party ob-
tained an electronic signature, the party promptly transmitted  a confirmation transmission to the
signer confirming that all of the  information described under paragraph (a)(A)(i) to (vi) of this sub-
section is true.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, when a petition  requesting certification has
been filed under subsection (2) of this section,  an employee or a group of employees in the unit
designated by the petition, or one or more of the unrepresented employees  seeking to be added to
an existing bargaining unit, may file  a petition with the board to request that a representation
election be conducted.
(b) The petition requesting a representation election must  be supported by at least 30 percent
of the employees in the bargaining unit designated by the petition, or  30 percent of the unrepre-
sented employees seeking to be added to an existing bargaining unit.
(c) The representation election shall be conducted on-site or  by mail not later than 45 days after
the date on which the petition was filed.
(5) Except as provided in ORS 243.692, if the board  finds in a hearing conducted pursuant to
subsection (1)(b) of  this section that a question of representation exists, the board shall conduct an
election by secret ballot, at a time and place convenient for  the employees of the jurisdiction and
also within a reasonable period of time after the filing has taken place, and certify the  results of
the election.
SECTION 3.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4115 (HB 4115-A) Page 6
Passed by House February 19, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4115 (HB 4115-A) Page 7